Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2952.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-28.2 of the General Laws entitled "Police Officers —
Commission on Standards and Training" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following
section:
42-28.2-8.6. Training in handling interactions with traumatized youth—Educational
requirements.
(a) The commission on standards and training shall prepare and publish mandatory training
standards to provide instructions for police detectives and police officers in handling interactions
with traumatized youth and shall develop guidelines for law enforcement responses to incidents
involving such persons. Instructions and guidelines shall include:
(1) Identifying and recognizing the signs and symptoms of youth suffering trauma as a
result of witnessing or resulting from an incident involving an intervention by law enforcement
officers; and
(2) Providing information to law enforcement officers on de-escalating crisis situations
involving traumatized youth and initiating timely referrals to resources available in the community.
(b) The commission shall include training in all curricula for recruits and in-service trainees
in all police academics operating or certified by the commission.
(c) All law enforcements trainees shall participate in the course of basic training for law
enforcement officers, established in this section, as part of their required certification process.

(d) Training presenters shall include intellectual/developmental, behavioral and
therapeutical practitioners with expertise in the delivery of direct services to traumatized youths
suffering from incidents requiring a response from law enforcement officers.
(e) The course of instruction, the learning and performance objectives, the standards for
training, and the guidelines shall be developed from existing sources for youth trauma-informed
policing from an evidence-based resource, including training on adverse childhood experiences,
trauma triggers and de-escalation strategies in community-based settings.
(f) Training presentations may utilize the staff of community-based providers of services
and supports for youth suffering from trauma related incidents as well as videos or webinars
developed by other federal, state or municipal law enforcements agencies.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005843
========
LC005843 - Page 2 of 3